xapian-core/languages/algorithms/polish.sbl
// Alias: pl

/* Polish stemmer. Author: Dmitry Shachnev */

stringescapes {}

stringdef ak '{U+0105}' // ą a + ogonek
stringdef ek '{U+0119}' // ę e + ogonek
stringdef l/ '{U+0142}' // ł l + stroke
stringdef c' '{U+0107}' // ć c + acute (kreska)
stringdef n' '{U+0144}' // ń n + acute (kreska)
stringdef o' '{U+00f3}' // ó o + acute (kreska)
stringdef s' '{U+015b}' // ś s + acute (kreska)
stringdef z' '{U+017a}' // ź z + acute (kreska)


externals (stem)


routines (
  mark_regions
  remove_endings
  normalize_consonant
  R1
)

integers ( p1 )

groupings ( v )

define v 'a{ak}e{ek}io{o'}uy'


define mark_regions as (
  $p1 = limit
  gopast v
  gopast non-v  setmark p1
)

backwardmode (
  define R1 as ($p1 <= cursor)

  define remove_endings as (
    // Verbs.
    do (
      setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring]) among (
        // conditionals:
        'bym'        // 1st person singular (czytał(a)bym)
        'by{s'}'     // 2nd person singular (czytał(a)byś)
        'by{s'}my'   // 1st person plural (czytalibyśmy)
        'by{s'}cie'  // 2nd person plural (czytalibyście)
        'by'         // 3rd person singular/plural (czytał(a)by, czytaliby)
          (delete)
      )
    )
    [substring] among (
      'asz'  'esz'  'isz'  // present 2nd person singular (czytasz, piszesz, nosisz)
      'amy'  'emy'  'imy'  // present 1st person plural (czytamy, piszemy, nosimy)
      'acie' 'ecie' 'icie' // present 2nd person plural (czytacie, piszecie, nosicie)
      'aj{ak}'             // present 3rd person plural (czytają)
      'e{s'}{c'}'          // infinitive (przynieść)
      'a{s'}{c'}'          // infinitive (popaść)
      'a{c'}'              // infinitive (czytać)
      'ie{c'}'             // infinitive (lecieć)
      'i{c'}'              // infinitive (wozić)
      '{ak}{c'}'           // infinitive (marznąć)
      'aj{ak}c' '{ak}c'    // contemporary adverbial participle (transgressive) (czytając, lecąc)
      'a{l/}em'       'ia{l/}em'       'i{l/}em'       // past 1st person singular masculine (czytałem, leciałem, chodziłem)
      'a{l/}am'       'ia{l/}am'       'i{l/}am'  'am' // past 1st person singular feminine (czytałam, leciałam, chodziłam, marzłam)
      'a{l/}e{s'}'    'ia{l/}e{s'}'    'i{l/}e{s'}'    // past 2nd person singular masculine (czytałeś, leciałeś, chodziłeś)
      'a{l/}a{s'}'    'ia{l/}a{s'}'    'i{l/}a{s'}'    // past 2nd person singular feminine (czytałaś, leciałaś, chodziłaś)
      'a{l/}'         'ia{l/}'         'i{l/}'         // past 3rd person singular masculine (czytał, leciał, chodził)
      'a{l/}a'        'ia{l/}a'        'i{l/}a'        // past 3rd person singular feminine (czytała, leciała, chodziła)
      'a{l/}o'        'ia{l/}o'        'i{l/}o'        // past 3rd person singular neuter (czytało, leciało, chodziło)
      'ali{s'}my'     'ieli{s'}my'     'ili{s'}my'     // past 1st person plural virile (czytaliśmy, lecieliśmy, chodziliśmy)
      'a{l/}y{s'}my'  'ia{l/}y{s'}my'  'i{l/}y{s'}my'  // past 1st person plural nonvirile (czytałyśmy, leciałyśmy, chodziłyśmy)
      'ali{s'}cie'    'ieli{s'}cie'    'ili{s'}cie'    // past 2nd person plural virile (czytaliście, lecieliście, chodziliście)
      'a{l/}y{s'}cie' 'ia{l/}y{s'}cie' 'i{l/}y{s'}cie' // past 2nd person plural nonvirile (czytałyście, leciałyście, chodziłyście)
      'ali'           'ieli'           'ili'           // past 3rd person plural virile (czytali, lecieli, chodzili)
      'a{l/}y'        'ia{l/}y'        'i{l/}y'        // past 3rd person plural nonvirile (czytały, leciały, chodziły)
      'aj'     // imperative 2nd person singular (czytaj)
      'ajcie'  // imperative 2nd person plural (czytajcie)
      'cie'    // imperative 2nd person plural (chodźcie)
      '{ek}'   // present 1st person singular (lecę)
        (delete)
      'sz{ek}' // present 1st person singular (noszę)
        (<- 's')
      'sz{ak}' // present 3rd person plural (noszą)
        // Also an adjectival form (singular feminine accusative), e.g. lepszą.
        // This heuristic does the right thing in common cases.
        (R1 and delete or <-'s')

      // There are short verbs whose root consists of only one consonant, e.g. być, żyć.
      // Stemming them to one letter would merge them with these letters used in other
      // contexts, which is undesirable. But let's at least merge all past tense forms
      // together, e.g. byłem, byłam, byłyśmy, etc. to był.
      '{l/}e{s'}'
      '{l/}a{s'}'
      'li{s'}my'
      '{l/}y{s'}my'
      'li{s'}cie'
      '{l/}y{s'}cie'
        (<- '{l/}')

      // Adjectives (including comparative/superlative forms)
      // as well as participles.
      'y'          // singular masculine nominative (nowy)
      'ego' 'iego' // singular masculine genitive (nowego, polskiego)
      'emu' 'iemu' // singular masculine dative (nowemu, polskiemu)
      'ym'  'im'   // singular masculine instrumental (nowym, polskim)
      'ej'  'iej'  // singular feminine genitive (nowej, polskiej)
      'ych' 'ich'  // plural genitive (nowych, polskich)
      'ymi' 'imi'  // plural instrumental (nowymi, polskimi)
        (
          delete
          try (
            [substring] among (
              'aj{ak}c'  // participle suffix (czytający)
              '{ak}c'    // participle suffix (lecący)
              'iejsz'    // comparative suffix (piękniejszy)
              'sz'       // comparative suffix (lepszy)
                (delete)
              'sz{ak}c'  // participle suffix (noszący)
                (<- 's')
            )
          )
        )
      // We cannot remove endings like -ą and -e unconditionally, because these
      // letters appear in too many contexts. But we can safely remove them if we
      // know that our word is a participle or a comparative/superlative form.
      'aj{ak}ca'    '{ak}ca'    'iejsza'    'sza'  // singular feminine nominative (czytająca, lecąca, piękniejsza, lepsza)
      'aj{ak}c{ak}' '{ak}c{ak}' 'iejsz{ak}'        // singular feminine accusative (czytającą, lecącą, piękniejszą); -szą is handled separately
      'aj{ak}ce'    '{ak}ce'    'iejsze'    'sze'  // singular neuter nominative (czytające, lecące, piękniejsze, lepsze)
        (delete)
      // Handle participles like nosząca, prosząca.
      'sz{ak}ca'
      'sz{ak}c{ak}'
      'sz{ak}ce'
        (<- 's')

      // Noun forms (excluding endings that were already handled above).
      'a' R1  'o' R1                            // singular nominative (książka, lato)
      'i' R1  'u' R1  'ia' R1                   // singular genitive (książki, stołu, słonia)
      'owi' R1  'iowi' R1                       // singular dative (stołowi, słoniowi)
      '{ak}' R1  'i{ak}' R1  'em' R1  'iem' R1  // singular instrumental (książką, możliwością, stołem, słoniem)
      'e' R1  'iu' R1                           // singular locative (stole, słoniu)
      'ie' R1                                   // plural nominative (słonie)
      '{o'}w' R1                                // plural genitive (stołów)
      'om' R1   'iom' R1                        // plural dative (książkom, słoniom)
      'ami' R1  'iami' R1                       // plural instrumental (książkami, słoniami)
      'ach' R1  'iach' R1                       // plural locative (książkach, słoniach)
        (delete)
    )
    try (['{'}'] delete)
  )

  define normalize_consonant as (
    // Remove kreska mark, because most of oblique cases do not have it.
    // Don't mutate single character inputs.
    [substring] not atlimit among (
      '{c'}' (<- 'c') // e.g. miłość → miłośc
      '{n'}' (<- 'n') // e.g. słoń → słon
      '{s'}' (<- 's') // e.g. gęś → gęs
      '{z'}' (<- 'z') // e.g. miedź → miedz
    )
  )
)

define stem as (
  do mark_regions
  // Make sure we don't produce too short outputs.  The "backwards" will
  // set the backwards limit to the current cursor position.
  (
    hop 2
    backwards remove_endings
  ) or (
    backwards normalize_consonant
  )
)
